Utah statutes.
53A-13-101.6.   Instruction on the flag of the United States of America.
(1)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking
Act, the State Board of Education shall provide by rule for a program of
instruction within the public schools relating to the flag of the United
States.
(2)  The instruction shall include the history of the flag, etiquette, customs
pertaining to the display and use of the flag, and other patriotic exercises
as provided by Sections 36 U.S.C. 170 to 177.
(3) (a)  The pledge of allegiance to the flag shall be recited:
(i)  at the beginning of the day in each elementary public school in the
state; and
(ii)  once a week at the beginning of a school day in each public secondary
school in the state.
(b)  Each student shall be informed by posting a notice in a conspicuous place
that the student has the right not to participate in reciting the pledge.
(c)  A student shall be excused from reciting the pledge upon written request
from the student's parent or legal guardian.
